Maryland, session 2026, HB0725.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–309.
IF REQUESTED BY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES, AN EMPLOYEE OR
AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE RELEASE OF AN INDIVIDUAL AT LEAST
48 HOURS PRIOR TO THE RELEASE OF THE INDIVIDUAL IN ORDER TO FACILITATE
THE TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0725*

HOUSE BILL 725
(2) TRANSFER THE INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES PROVIDED THAT THE TRANSFER DOES NOT EXTEND THE TIME IN
CUSTODY OF THE INDIVIDUAL BEYOND THE INDIVIDUAL’S SCHEDULED RELEASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.